Washington statutes.
RCW 9.91.020

Operating railroad, steamboat, vehicle, etc., while intoxicated.

Every person who, being employed upon any railway, as engineer, motor operator, grip operator, conductor, switch tender, fire tender, bridge tender, flagger, or signal operator, or having charge of stations, starting, regulating, or running trains upon a railway, or being employed as captain, engineer, or other officer of a vessel propelled by steam, or being the driver of any animal or vehicle upon any public highway, street, or other public place, is intoxicated while engaged in the discharge of any such duties, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2013 c 23 s 4; 2000 c 239 s 3; 1915 c 165 s 2; 1909 c 249 s 275; RRS s 2527.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: Caption for 1915 c 165 s 2 reads as follows: "Section 2527 [Rem. & Bal.] Intoxication of employees." See State v. Crothers, 118 Wash. 226, 203 P. 74 (1922).

Captions not law—2000 c 239: See note following RCW 49.17.350.

Hunting while intoxicated—Penalty: RCW 77.15.675.

Operating vehicle under influence of intoxicants or drugs: RCW 46.20.285, 46.61.502.

Operating vessel in reckless manner or while under influence of alcohol or drugs: RCW 79A.60.040.

Railroads, employees, equipment, operations: Chapters 81.40, 81.44, 81.48 RCW.